Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 285A.154 is amended to read:
285A.154. (1) The  Oregon Broadband Advisory Council is established within the Oregon Business
Development Department. The council consists of 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint 11  members who, to the extent possible, represent geographically
diverse regions of this state, as follows:
(A) One member to represent the counties of this state.
(B) One member to represent the cities of this state.
(C) Two members to represent telecommunications service  providers. At least one member must
represent  a  service provider that provides telecommunications services in rural Oregon with pref-
erence for appointment given to a service provider that is headquartered in rural Oregon.
(D) One member to represent Oregon tribes.
(E) One member to represent education or public libraries.
(F) One member to represent rural business or economic development districts.
(G) One member to represent urban business or economic development districts.
(H) One member to represent telehealth.
(I) One member to represent  the digital equity interests of historically disadvantaged communi-
ties.
(J) One member to represent consumers and the public at large.
(b) The Speaker of the House  of Representatives shall appoint one nonvoting member who is a
member of the House of Representatives.
(c) The President of the Senate shall appoint one nonvoting member  who is a member of the
Senate.
(2) The term of office of each voting member is four years, but a voting member serves  at the
pleasure of  the Governor. Before the term of a voting member expires, the Governor shall appoint
a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following.  A voting member is eligible for reap-
pointment for one additional term. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make  an
appointment that becomes immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) The nonvoting legislative members  shall serve two-year terms and are eligible for reap-
pointment.
Enrolled House Bill 4040 (HB 4040-A) Page 1
(4) Members of the council who are not  members of the Legislative Assembly are not entitled
to compensation, but voting  members may be paid expenses if funding is available from contributions
the Oregon Business Development Department accepts under ORS 285A.157 (2).
(5) Members of the council who are members  of the Legislative Assembly are entitled to com-
pensation and expense reimbursement as provided in ORS 171.072.
(6) The council shall  select one of the council’s voting members as chairperson and another
voting member as vice chairperson, for a two-year term. The chairperson and vice chairperson  may
not serve for more than two consecutive terms.
(7) A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a quorum for transacting busi-
ness.
(8) The council shall meet  every three months at a place, day and hour determined by the
council. The council may also meet  at other times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the council.
(9) A majority of the voting members of the council  must approve official action by the council.
The council may recommend legislation, public policy and solutions to  address the state’s broadband
needs and goals.
(10) The council shall:
(a) Advise the Oregon Broadband Office on  the development and implementation of Oregon’s
broadband strategy.
(b) Advise the Oregon Broadband  Office on the scalability, resilience and sustainability of
Oregon’s broadband infrastructure.
(c) Assist the Oregon Broadband Office in developing  ideas to streamline deployment of
broadband infrastructure and in ensuring continual progress toward achieving state goals.
(d) Review and update state goals regarding broadband service speeds in consideration of federal
requirements and to ensure that Oregon residents and businesses are prepared for future needs.
(e) Advise the Oregon  Broadband Office on best practices to guide the development and imple-
mentation of  state grant programs, including project review, opportunities for appeal and project
accountability.
(f) Support local governments, providers and stakeholders in project planning and development.
(g) Champion equitable statewide access and adoption of broadband services.
(h) For competitive broadband grant programs, review grant applications for  compliance
with the program’s legal requirements and make recommendations to the  Oregon Broadband
Office at a council meeting held pursuant to subsection (8) of this section.
[(11)(a) The council shall establish a grant application review committee for each grant cycle. ]
[(b) Subject to grant rules, a grant application review  committee shall review grant applications
and submit directly to the Oregon Broadband Office recommendations. ]
[(c) An individual  may not serve on a grant application review committee if the individual is em-
ployed by or receives compensation  from an entity that is under consideration for a grant through the
Oregon Broadband Office. ]
[(12)] (11) All agencies  of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, shall assist the council
in the  performance of the council’s duties and, to the extent permitted by laws relating to
confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice as  the members of the council consider nec-
essary to perform the members’ duties.
SECTION 2.
 Section 10, chapter 546, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “County fair” and “county  fairgrounds” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 565.010.
(b) “County fair operator” means a county fair board, fair association or fair district that  op-
erates a county fair.
(c)(A) “Earned revenue” means revenue from the sale of goods or services,  including, but not
limited to, admission tickets, charges for services, rentals, permits and fees, merchandise, food  and
beverages, advertising and contracted services and performances.
Enrolled House Bill 4040 (HB 4040-A) Page 2
(B) “Earned revenue” does not include other sources of revenue,  including, but not limited to,
donations, federal, state and local governmental grants or returns on investments.
(d) “Fair association” has the meaning given that term in ORS 565.268.
(e) “Fair district” means an entity described in ORS 565.275.
(f) “Fair operator” means a county fair operator or the Oregon State  Fair and Expo
Center.
(g) “Oregon State Fair” has the meaning given that term in ORS 565.451.
(h) “State fairgrounds” means fairground properties  and facilities, as defined in ORS
565.451.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop and implement a  program for
awarding grants directly to :
(a) County fair operators for  the operation of county fairs and the maintenance and repair of
county fairgrounds[ .]; and
(b) The Oregon State Fair and Expo Center for the operation of the Oregon State Fair
and the maintenance and repair of state fairgrounds.
(3) To be eligible for a  grant, a [ county] fair operator must demonstrate to the department’s
satisfaction that, at any time after February 29, 2020, and before June 30, 2023, the fair operator
experienced  a  significant loss in earned revenue from the operation of a county fair or county
fairgrounds , or the operation of  the Oregon State Fair or state fairgrounds,  because of state-
wide mandates, or guidance of the Oregon Health Authority,  in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
(4)(a) The department shall prescribe the form and process, including the application period,  by
which [ county] fair operators may apply for and be awarded grants under the program.
(b) Applications must, at a minimum, require applicants to  state their lost earned revenue as
described in subsection (3) of this section.
(c) For purposes of reviewing applications, the department may require applicants to provide:
(A) The applicant’s federal tax return for the periods to which the application relates; and
(B) Financial documentation, including, but not  limited to, audited financial statements or fi-
nancial statements that have been approved by a certified public accountant.
(5) Before awarding grants, the department may withhold an amount not to exceed five  percent
of the total amount allocated under  section 9 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 546, Oregon Laws 2023,
to reimburse the department for the actual costs of developing and implementing the program.
(6) The department shall award grants to reimburse [ county] fair operators for lost earned re-
venue supported by their applications as follows:
(a) If the total of all grant award amounts exceeds $3 million, less any  amount withheld under
subsection (5) of this section, the amounts shall be reduced proportionally until they  equal $3
million, less any amount withheld under subsection (5) of this section; or
(b) If  the total of all grant award amounts is less than $3 million, less any amount withheld
under subsection (5) of  this section, the amounts shall be increased proportionally until they equal
$3 million, less any amount withheld under subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4040 (HB 4040-A) Page 3
Passed by House February 19, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4040 (HB 4040-A) Page 4